District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Nonprofit Services Preservation Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Nonprofit Fair Compensation Act of 2020, effective March 16, 2021 (D.C.
Law 23-185; D.C. Official Code § 2-222.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 2-222.01) is amended as follows:
(1) New paragraphs (1A) and (1B) are added to read as follows:
“(1A) "Consumer Price Index" means the average of the Consumer Price Index
for All Urban Consumers for the Washington-Arlington-Alexandria, DC-MD-VA-WV
Metropolitan Statistical Area (or such successor metropolitan statistical area that includes the
District), or any successor index, as of the close of the 12-month period ending on July 31 of
such calendar year.
“(1B) “Cost estimate” means an independent government estimate solicitation or
similar solicitation cost estimate.”.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) “Indirect cost” means:
“(A) A cost incurred by a nonprofit organization as a District grantee or
contractor that cannot be readily attributed to a specific program, grant award, or contract; or
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Expenses considered an indirect cost as provided in 2 C.F.R. §
200.56, or any successor regulations.”.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 2-222.02) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead in language is amended by striking the phrase “indirect costs
incurred in provision of goods or performance of services” and inserting the phrase “indirect
costs, in addition to direct service costs and without supplanting any portion of a grant or
contract awarded, incurred for the provision of goods or performance of services, provided there
is funding available,” in its place.
(B) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “10% of all direct
costs under the grant or contract” and inserting the phrase “15%, adjusted annually to reflect
adjustments to the Consumer Price Index, of all direct costs under the grant or contract;
provided, that an annual CPI adjustment shall not be in excess of 3% more than the de minimis
rate of the previous year” in its place.
(C) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “2 years; however
nonprofit organizations may request to renegotiate indirect cost rates pursuant to subsection (c)
of this section;” and inserting the phrase “3 years; however, nonprofit organizations may request
to renegotiate indirect cost rates with the District pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), or (4) of this
subsection or subsection (b) of this section;” in its place.
(D) Paragraph (4) is amended to read as follows:
“(4) As calculated with a percentage rate and base amount, as determined by:
“(A) A certified public accountant using the nonprofit organization’s most
recently completed audited financial statements for a fiscal year that concluded not more than 3
years prior, pursuant to the OMB Uniform Guidance, and certified in writing by the certified
public accountant; or
“(B) If a nonprofit organization’s annual revenue totals less than $250,000
and certified public accountant-conducted audit documents are not available, an independent
bookkeeping or financial services firm using the nonprofit organization’s end-of-year income or
activities statements from the immediately preceding fiscal year.”.
(2) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1)(1)(A) A nonprofit organization’s request for payment based on an unexpired
NICRA or District-negotiated indirect cost rate, as determined pursuant to subsection (a)(2), (3),
or (4) of this section, shall not be used as the sole or determinative factor in a decision to deny,
reduce, or terminate a grant or contract.
“(B) When making a grant or contract award decision, the District shall
only use a nonprofit organization’s requested or negotiated indirect cost rate as a screening
criteria after assessing that the organization can meet the desired quality standards.
“(2) The Mayor may require a nonprofit organization to provide reasonable
financial documentation when negotiating with a District agency pursuant to subsection (a)(2),
(3), or (4) of this section, such as:
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) Financial audit statements from the immediately preceding fiscal
year;
“(B) End-of-fiscal-year income or activities statements, dating back not
more than 3 years, showing a nonprofit organization’s total revenue and expenditures; or
“(C) Expense sheets detailing operating costs and salaries that meet the
definition of indirect costs.”.
(3) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c)(1) Each District contract and grant solicitation and award for services to be
performed by a nonprofit organization shall include an indirect cost compensation clause, in
plain language, that:
“(A) Obligates the District to compensate for indirect costs in addition to
direct service costs if the applicant discloses their requested rate amount calculated pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section in their application;
“(B) Fulfills the requirement of subsection (a-1) of this section;
“(C) Provides an awarding agency point of contact, email, and phone
number for a grantee or contractor to communicate with regarding indirect cost rates,
negotiations, or appeal processes if an organization believes the District is in violation of this act;
and
“(D) Obligates the grantee or contractor to pay an indirect cost rate to any
nonprofit organization subcontractor or subgrantee at the same rate the nonprofit organization
would receive as a direct contractor or grantee with the District.”.
(4) Subsection (e) is repealed.
(c) New sections 3a, 3b, and 3c are added to read as follows:
“Sec. 3a. Implementation.
“(a)(1) No later than 180 business days after the applicability date of this subsection, the
Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved
October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall promulgate rules for
District agencies to fairly and uniformly calculate, negotiate, award, and pay indirect cost rates
for nonprofit organizations receiving District grants.
“(2) The Mayor shall make available online a plain language explanation of the
regulations. The Mayor shall consult non-profit stakeholders when drafting the explanation to
ensure clarity and readability.
“(b)(1) No later than 180 business days after the applicability date of this subsection, the
Office of Contracting and Procurement (“Office”) shall promulgate rules for District agencies to
fairly and uniformly calculate, negotiate, award, and pay indirect cost rates to nonprofit
organizations receiving District contracts.
“(2) The Office shall post a plain language explanation of the regulations on the
Office’s website. The Office shall consult non-profit stakeholders when drafting the explanation
to ensure clarity and readability.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c)(1) Beginning not later than 90 business days after the promulgation of the rules
required by subsection (b) of this section, the Mayor shall conduct annual training sessions for all
District agencies on the calculation, negotiation, award, and payment of grant and contract
indirect cost rates for nonprofit organizations. Completion of such training on an annual basis
shall be mandatory for all agency employees directly involved in the solicitation or management
of District grants or contracts with nonprofit organizations.
“(2) The Mayor shall develop training sessions for subordinate agencies regarding
agency compliance with the requirements of this act, which shall include:
“(A) Explanation of costs eligible to be classified as an indirect cost;
“(B) Guidance on District procedures regarding fairly calculating or
negotiating indirect cost rates;
“(C) Explanation of the District’s appeals process related to negotiating or
awarding an indirect cost rate; and
“(D) Other topics deemed appropriate to ensure accurate implementation
and compliance with this act.
“(d) No later than 120 business days after the promulgation of the rules required by
subsection (b) of this section, District agencies shall include plain language clauses in all grant
and contract solicitations and awards to nonprofit organizations explaining their right to payment
for indirect cost rates pursuant to section 3.
“Sec. 3b. Non-profit relief grantmaking.
“(a)
(1) The Mayor may issue general operating relief grants to nonprofit
organizations involved in the delivery of human services and other community-based activities in
the District.
“(2) Applications for such grants may be open on a rolling basis.
“(3) The application shall include:
“(A) A list of any contracts or grant agreements that the applicant is
seeking or holds with the District government;
“(B) Expense sheets detailing operating costs and salaries that meet the
definition of indirect costs;
“(C) Explanation of organizational general operating hardship and
intended uses of the relief grant;
“(D) Financial audit statements from the immediately preceding fiscal
year; and
“(E) End-of-fiscal-year income or activities statements, dating back not
more than 3 years, showing a nonprofit organization’s total revenue and expenditures.
“(b) Relief grants issued pursuant to this section may be in the form of matching funds
for organizations that receive funds from nongovernmental sources to cover indirect costs and
other nonprogrammatic organizational expenses.
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) For the purposes of this section, the term “relief grants” shall mean a grant issued by
the Mayor for the purpose of strengthening a nonprofit organization’s financial viability,
enabling the organization to meet indirect costs when providing services to District residents and
encouraging private partnership in support of meeting nonprofit general operating expenses.
“Sec. 3c. Rules.
“The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure
Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue
rules to implement the provisions of this act.”.
(d) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 2-222.03) is amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4. Applicability.
“(a) Section 3(a), (a-1), and (c) shall apply:
“(1) For grant and contract solicitations with a cost estimate at or below $500,000,
beginning in Fiscal Year 2027;
“(2) For grant and contract solicitations with a cost estimate at or below $1
million, but greater than $500,000, beginning on the first day of the new fiscal year following the
applicability of paragraph (1) of this subsection;
“(3) For grant and contract solicitations with a cost estimate at or below $2
million, but greater than $1 million, beginning on the first day of the new fiscal year following
the applicability of paragraph (2) of this subsection;
“(4) For grant and contract solicitations with a cost estimate at or below $5
million, but greater than $2 million, beginning on the first day of the new fiscal year following
the applicability of paragraph (3) of this subsection;
“(5) For grant and contract solicitations with a cost estimate at or below $10
million, but greater than $5 million, beginning on the first day of the new fiscal year following
the applicability of paragraph (4) of this subsection; and
“(6) For grant and contract solicitations with a cost estimate above $10 million
beginning on the first day of the new fiscal year following the applicability of paragraph (5) of
this subsection.
“(b) The provisions of this act shall not apply to the disbursement of business
improvement district taxes pursuant to section 16 of the Business Improvement Districts Act of
1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134; D.C. Official Code § 2-1215.15).”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
(a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of this act.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
6